Tennessee, session 114, SB1277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-14-108(b)(1)(O), is amended by
deleting "sixteen and five-tenths (16.5) acres" and substituting "forty-one (41) acres".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-14-108(b)(2), is amended by
adding the following as new subdivisions:
( ) Clifty Creek Gorge. A forested area of approximately eighty-nine (89) acres
in Morgan County containing a scenic gorge of Clifty Creek that flows into the Emory
River and protects the federally threatened Virginia spirea (Spiraea virginiana);
( ) Rocky Hill. An approximately one (1) acre site in Rutherford County that
protects the type locality of the state endangered running glade clover (Trifolium
calcaricum) and limestone cedar glade habitat;
( ) Union Grove. An area of approximately fifty-nine (59) acres in Hamblen
County that protects high-quality oak and mixed forest, headwater streams, and the
state endangered Tennessee trillium (Trillium tennesseense), a species discovered new
to science in 2013;
( ) Versailles Knob. A forest of approximately forty (40) acres in Rutherford
County that protects a population of the federally endangered Braun's Rockcress
(Boechera perstellata) with large limestone outcrops that provide habitat for the
rockcress;
SB1277
000165
- 1 -

SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-14-108(b)(2)(B), is amended by
deleting "Barnett’s Woods" and substituting "Barnett's Woods and Prairie" and by deleting "forty
(40) acre site" and substituting " site of one hundred fifty-six (156) acres".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-14-108(b)(2)(G), is amended by
deleting "two thousand six hundred ninety (2,690) acres" and substituting "two thousand seven
hundred fifty-four (2,754) acres".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-14-108(b)(2)(I), is amended by
deleting "one hundred forty (140) acre site" and substituting "site of six hundred twenty-seven
(627) acres".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-14-108(b)(2)(P), is amended by
deleting "eight hundred forty-six (846) acres" and substituting "nine hundred twenty-eight (928)
acres".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-14-108(b)(2)(S), is amended by
deleting "two hundred forty-nine (249) acre site" and substituting "site of two hundred seventy-
three (273) acres".
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-14-108(b)(2)(NN), is amended by
deleting "three thousand (3,000) acres" and substituting "three thousand six hundred (3,600)
acres".
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-14-108(b)(2)(PP), is amended by
deleting "one thousand three hundred sixty-seven (1,367) acre area" and substituting "area of
one thousand three hundred eighty-eight (1,388) acres".
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 11-14-108(b)(2)(LLL), is amended
by deleting "four hundred twenty-eight (428) acres" and substituting "four hundred seventy-six
(476) acres".
SECTION 11. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000165